src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
! ============ !
! Proper nouns !
! ============ !

! Table of content
! ================
! _ The guessed ones
! _ The morphological tags
! _ _ Male first names
! _ _ Female first names
! _ _ Surnames
! _ _ Place names and other names

LEXICON guess
 < [A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|Q|R|S|T|U|V|W|X|Y|Z|Æ|Ø|Å
   |Á|É|Í|Ó|Ú|Ý|Ä|Ö|Ü]
   [a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z|æ|ø|å
   |á|ð|é|í|ó|ú|ý|ä|ö|ü]*
   [a|e|i|o|u|æ|ø|å|á|é|í|ó|ú|ý|ä|ö|ü]
   [a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z|æ|ø|å]*
   [b|c|d|e|f|g|h|j|k|l|o|q|v|w|x|y|z|æ|ø|å|á|é|í|ó|ú|ý|ä|ö|ü]
   %+N:0 %+Prop:0 %+Sg:0 %+Err%/Orth:0
 > guesstag ;

LEXICON guesstag
 +Nom+Err/Guess:  # ;
 +Acc+Err/Guess:  # ;
 +Dat+Err/Guess:  # ; !+i ?
 +Gen+Err/Guess:s # ;




! The morphological tags
! ======================

! For each group, the maltag etc. lexicon functions as a default
! lexicon. The other lexica are there for specific subgroups of the names.

! Indeclineables
! ______________

LEXICON indeclattr
 +Det+Prop+Attr: # ; ! "The" i "The full Monty"

LEXICON indeclorg ! Den Danske Bank
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: indeclcase ;

LEXICON indeclplc ! Færøerne
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: indeclcase ;

LEXICON indeclcase
 +Sg+Nom: # ;
 +Sg+Acc: # ;
 +Sg+Dat: # ;
 +Sg+Gen: # ;


! Male first names
! ________________

!this is like BOAS
!It means just "not checked"
LEXICON maltag
    +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom:      #     ;
    +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc:      #     ;
    +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Dat:%>i   #     ;
    +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen:%>s   #     ;
 sdóttir+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg:sdótt kv30e ;
  ssonur+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg:sson  k47   ;
   sonur+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg:son   k47   ;

LEXICON MUSTAFA
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom:     #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc:     #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Dat:     #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen:     #     ;
       dóttir+N+Prop+Sg:dótt kv30e ;
        sonur+N+Prop+Sg:son  k47   ;
        +N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>sa #     ; !SAFORM

LEXICON ARI
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom:%>i   #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc:%>a   #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Dat:%>a   #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen:%>a   #     ;
      adóttir+N+Prop+Sg:adótt kv30e ;
       asonur+N+Prop+Sg:ason  k47   ;
        +N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>asa #     ; !SAFORM

LEXICON HARRIGUD
 +N+Prop+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>i    # ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>a    # ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>a    # ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>a    # ;
   +N+Prop+Sg+Nom+Def:%>in   # ;
   +N+Prop+Sg+Acc+Def:%>an   # ;
   +N+Prop+Sg+Dat+Def:%>anum # ;
   +N+Prop+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ans  # ;
      +N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>asa  # ; !SAFORM

LEXICON WILLY
    +N+Prop+Sg+Nom:      #     ;
    +N+Prop+Sg+Acc:      #     ;
    +N+Prop+Sg+Dat:      #     ;
    +N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>s   #     ;
 sdóttir+N+Prop+Sg:sdótt kv30e ;
  ssonur+N+Prop+Sg:sson  k47   ;
   +N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>sa  #     ; !SAFORM

LEXICON DAGUR
    +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom:ur    #     ;
    +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc:      #     ;
    +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Dat:%>i   #     ;
    +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen:%>s   #     ;
 sdóttir+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg:sdótt kv30e ;
  ssonur+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg:sson  k47   ;
   +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Poss:%>asa #     ; !SAFORM

LEXICON TRÓNDUR
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom:ur     #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc:       #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Dat:%>i    #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen:%>ar   #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%>s    #     ; ! XXX s_gen?
     ardóttir+N+Prop+Sg:ardótt kv30e ;
      arsonur+N+Prop+Sg:arson  k47   ;
      sdóttir+N+Prop+Sg:sdótt  kv30e ;
       ssonur+N+Prop+Sg:sson   k47   ;
        +N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>asa  #     ; !SAFORM

LEXICON HÁVARÐUR
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom:ur     #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc:       #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Dat:%>i    #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen:%>ar   #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen:%>s    #     ;
      sdóttir+N+Prop+Sg:sdótt  kv30e ;
     ardóttir+N+Prop+Sg:ardótt kv30e ;
       ssonur+N+Prop+Sg:sson   k47   ;
      arsonur+N+Prop+Sg:arson  k47   ;
        +N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>asa  #     ; !SAFORM

LEXICON DÁVUR
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom:ur    #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc:%>a   #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Dat:%>a   #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen:%>a   #     ;
      adóttir+N+Prop+Sg:adótt kv30e ;
       asonur+N+Prop+Sg:ason  k47   ;
        +N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>asa #     ; !SAFORM

LEXICON BOAS
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom:       #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc:       #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Dat:%>i    #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen:%>ar   #     ;
     ardóttir+N+Prop+Sg:ardótt kv30e ;
      arsonur+N+Prop+Sg:arson  k47   ;
        +N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>asa  #     ; !SAFORM

LEXICON BJØRN
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom:       #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc:       #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Dat:       #     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Dat:%>i    #     ; !birni, fix
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen:%>ar   #     ; !bjarnar
     ardóttir+N+Prop+Sg:ardótt kv30e ;
      arsonur+N+Prop+Sg:arson  k47   ;
        +N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>asa  #     ; !SAFORM


! Female first names
! __________________
LEXICON RUT
  +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom:      # ;
  +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc:      # ;
  +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Dat:      # ;
  +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen:%>ar  # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Poss:%>asa # ; !SAFORM

LEXICON SARA
  +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom:     # ;
  +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc:     # ;
  +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Dat:%>i  # ;
  +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen:%>s  # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Poss:%>sa # ; !SAFORM

LEXICON ASTA
  +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom:%>a   # ;
  +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc:%>u   # ;
  +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Dat:%>u   # ;
  +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen:%>u   # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Poss:%>usa # ; !SAFORM

! LEXICON SIV
! LEXICON ø>a


! Surnames
! ________


LEXICON surtag
  +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom:          # ;
  +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc:          # ;
  +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Dat:%>i       # ; ! ..ssoni
  +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Dat:%^IUML%>i # ; ! ..ssyni
  +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen:%>s       # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Poss:%>asa     # ; !SAFORM

! Place names and other names
! ___________________________
LEXICON plctag
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:    # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc:    # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Dat:%>i # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:%>s # ;

LEXICON fplctag !fem
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:     # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc:     # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Dat:     # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:%>ar # ;

LEXICON orgtag ! XXXcheck
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom:    # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc:    # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Dat:%>i # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen:%>s # ;

LEXICON vehtag ! XXXcheck
 +N+Prop+Sem/Veh+Sg+Nom:    # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Veh+Sg+Acc:    # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Veh+Sg+Dat:%>i # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Veh+Sg+Gen:%>s # ;

LEXICON mscorgtag ! XXXcheck
 +N+Prop+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Prop+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Prop+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Prop+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;
! Sosialurin

LEXICON SOSIALURIN
+N+Prop+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>urin # ;
+N+Prop+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:%>in # ;
+N+Prop+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:%>inum # ;

LEXICON neuorgtag ! XXXcheck
 +N+Prop+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
 +N+Prop+Neu: S_N_SGDG ;
! eimskip


LEXICON ROMA
     +N+Prop+Sg+Nom:%>a  # ;
     +N+Prop+Sg+Acc:%>u  # ;
     +N+Prop+Sg+Dat:%>u  # ;
     +N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>u  # ;

!LEXICON plcpl
! +N+Prop+Sg+Pl+Nom:%>ar # ;
! +N+Prop+Sg+Pl+Acc:%>ar # ;
! +N+Prop+Sg+Pl+Dat:%>um # ;
! +N+Prop+Sg+Pl+Gen:%>a  # ;


LEXICON SUDUROY

 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom+Indef:          # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc+Indef:          # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Dat+Indef:          # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar      # ;
   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>in      # ;
   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc+Def:%>ina     # ;
   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Dat+Def:%>nni     # ;
   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Def:%>arinnar # ;

LEXICON FLOKKUR
 flokkur:flokk propnoun_org_k9 ;

! These are the lexica taken from the noun_fao_lex.txt file.

LEXICON propnoun_h_flt10
 +Prop: h_flt10 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h_flt25 
 +Prop: h_flt25 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h_flt8
 +Prop: h_flt8 ;

LEXICON propnoun_plc_h11
 +Prop+Sem/Plc: h11 ;

LEXICON propnoun_plc_h11e
 +Prop+Sem/Plc: h11e ;

LEXICON propnoun_h11
 +Prop: h11 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h11e
 +Prop: h11e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k13e
 +Prop: k13e ;
