src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON names
Argir:Arg propnoun_h_flt25 ;
Mizpa indeclplc ;
Etika indeclplc ;
Spanien indeclplc ;
Malaisia indeclplc ;
Polaris indeclplc ;
Hip% Hop indeclplc ;
Avstralien indeclplc ;
Argjavegur:Argjaveg propnoun_k13e ;
Klaksvíksvegur:Klaksvíksveg propnoun_k13e ;
Fámjin indeclplc ;
Føroyahús propnoun_plc_h11 ;
Boðanes propnoun_h11 ;
EB% hús propnoun_plc_h11 ;
Skraddarahús propnoun_plc_h11 ;
Fjarðavegur:Fjarðaveg propnoun_k13e ;
Flatabøur:Flatabø propnoun_k13e ;
Kongsbøur:Kongsbø propnoun_k13e ;
Oyrargjáarvegur:Oyrargjáarveg propnoun_k13e ;
Skraddaravegur:Skraddaraveg propnoun_k13e ;
Velbastaðvegur:Velbastaðveg propnoun_k13e ;
Klettafjøll propnoun_h_flt10 ;
Norðurlandahús propnoun_plc_h11 ;
Nes propnoun_h11 ;
Slættanes propnoun_h11 ;
Hvítanes propnoun_h11 ;
Skarvanes propnoun_h11 ;
Mykines propnoun_h11 ;
Streymnes propnoun_h11 ;
Argir propnoun_h_flt25 ;
Hornalond propnoun_h_flt8 ;
Baltalond propnoun_h_flt8 ;
Eysturlond propnoun_h_flt8 ;
Niðurlond propnoun_h_flt8 ;
Norðurlond propnoun_h_flt8 ;
Norðlond propnoun_h_flt8 ;
Giljanes propnoun_h11e ;
Aske MUSTAFA ;
Cederius MUSTAFA ;
Enokur MUSTAFA ;
Glentborg MUSTAFA ;
Jólfríð MUSTAFA ;
Ninnbjørg MUSTAFA ;
Solva MUSTAFA ;
Lars-Nila MUSTAFA ;
Abbedienga:Abbedieng ROMA ;
Makedonia:Makedoni ROMA ;
Osaka:Osak ROMA ;
Lappekodisilla:Lappekodisill ROMA ;
Morena:Moren ROMA ;
Vest-Sahara:Vest-Sahar ROMA ;
Onesirofosa:Onesirofos ROMA ;
Fokstua:Fokstu ROMA ;
Sára SARA ;
Hágar SARA ;
Forda:Ford ASTA ;
Elia:Eli ASTA ;
Annika:Annik ASTA ;
Poula:Poul ASTA ;
Josefina:Josefin ASTA ;
Nanna:Nann ASTA ;
Vera:Ver ASTA ;
Beata:Beat ASTA ;
Harri:Harr HARRIGUD ;
Bjarki:Bjark ARI ;
Remi:Rem ARI ;
Giovanni:Giovann ARI ;
Kartni:Kartn ARI ;
Torri:Torr ARI ;
Ási:Ás ARI ;
Matti:Matt ARI ;
Sørkvi:Sørkv ARI ;
Vebjørn BJØRN ;
Hildibjørn BJØRN ;
Kolbjørn BJØRN ;
Sveinbjørn BJØRN ;
Gunnbjørn BJØRN ;
Geirbjørn BJØRN ;
Tórbjørn BJØRN ;
Snæbjørn BJØRN ;
Oyvindur:Oyvind TRÓNDUR ;
Gundur:Gund TRÓNDUR ;
Tróndur:Trónd TRÓNDUR ;
Trøstur:Trøst TRÓNDUR ;
Bárður:Bárð TRÓNDUR ;
Tórður:Tórð TRÓNDUR ;
Sjúrður:Sjúrð TRÓNDUR ;
Róaldur:Róald DAGUR ;
Sigmundur:Sigmund TRÓNDUR ;
Steinmundur:Steinmund DAGUR ;
Henningur:Henning DAGUR ;
Tíðrikur:Tíðrik DAGUR ;
Vagnur:Vagn DAGUR ;
Sighvatur:Sighvat DAGUR ;
Brynleivur:Brynleiv DAGUR ;
Tjóðolvur:Tjóðolv DAGUR ;
Bónda FLOKKUR ;
Fólka FLOKKUR ;
Handilsskúla FLOKKUR ;
Høgra FLOKKUR ;
Innan FLOKKUR ;
Loysingar FLOKKUR ;
Tjóðveldis FLOKKUR ;
Mið FLOKKUR ;
Dávur:Dáv DÁVUR ;
Hallvarður:Hallvarð HÁVARÐUR ;
Hervarður:Hervarð HÁVARÐUR ;
Jatvarður:Jatvarð HÁVARÐUR ;
Hávarður:Hávarð HÁVARÐUR ;
Eyðvarður:Eyðvarð HÁVARÐUR ;
Hermóður:Hermóð HÁVARÐUR ;
Tormóður:Tormóð HÁVARÐUR ;
Ásmóður:Ásmóð HÁVARÐUR ;
Grias BOAS ;
Bóas BOAS ;
Jóannis BOAS ;
Nemus BOAS ;
Laurus BOAS ;
Ife RUT ;
Grethe RUT ;
Kine RUT ;
Agate RUT ;
Arnlaug RUT ;
Vivi RUT ;
Jorunn RUT ;
Undis RUT ;
Lilly RUT ;
Vasco WILLY ;
Romeo WILLY ;
Perho WILLY ;
Kojo WILLY ;
Kulo WILLY ;
Seppo WILLY ;
Bobby WILLY ;
Ronny WILLY ;
Fugloy 	  SUDUROY ;
Kunoy 	  SUDUROY ;
Svínoy 	  SUDUROY ;
Nólsoy 	  SUDUROY ;
Skúvoy 	  SUDUROY ;
Borðoy 	  SUDUROY ;
Streymoy  SUDUROY ;
Suðuroy SUDUROY ;
Færøerne indeclplc ;
Tinganes propnoun_plc_h11e ;
Trøllanes propnoun_h11e ;
Skipanes propnoun_h11e ;
Morskranes propnoun_h11e ;
Katanes propnoun_h11e ;
Saltnes propnoun_h11e ;
Kurzeme plctag ;
Hawaii plctag ;
Brandal plctag ;
Åfjorden plctag ;
Långviksmon plctag ;
Amur plctag ;
Middagsfjellet plctag ;
Tromsøy plctag ;
Keypmannhavn fplctag ;
KíF orgtag ;
StíF orgtag ;
Inc orgtag ;
McBride orgtag ;
FjordLine orgtag ;
Viking orgtag ;
Petroleum orgtag ;
Continent orgtag ;
Sosialurin:Sosial SOSIALURIN ;
Eimskip  neuorgtag ;
Samskip  neuorgtag ;
Titanic vehtag ;
Eberhard maltag ;
Keith maltag ;
Michael maltag ;
Halgrim maltag ;
Saladin maltag ;
Philipp maltag ;
Claes maltag ;
Orpheus BOAS ;
Markus BOAS ;
Jordaneanus BOAS ;
Bogislav maltag ;
Ahava surtag ;
Brårud surtag ;
Tjaberg surtag ;
Kulppi surtag ;
Hatlem surtag ;
Poikolainen surtag ;
Thorfinn surtag ;
Platvoet surtag ;
Den% Danske% Bank%   indeclorg ;
The indeclattr ;
